test/src/morphology/N-linna_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - linna: # Noun 'borg' - full paradigm
     linna+N+Sg+Nom: linna
     linna+N+Sg+Gen: linnan
     linna+N+Sg+Acc: linnan
     linna+N+Sg+Par: linna
     linna+N+Sg+Tra: linnaksi
     linna+N+Sg+Abe: linnatta
     linna+N+Sg+Com: linnain
     linna+N+Sg+Ine: linnassa
     linna+N+Sg+Ela: linnasta
     linna+N+Sg+Ill: linnhaan
     linna+N+Sg+Ade: linnala
     linna+N+Sg+Abl: linnalta
     linna+N+Sg+All: linnale
     linna+N+Sg+Ess: linnana
     linna+N+Pl+Nom: linnat
     linna+N+Pl+Gen: linnojen
     linna+N+Pl+Acc: linnat
     linna+N+Pl+Par: linnaita
     linna+N+Pl+Tra: linnoiksi
     linna+N+Pl+Abe: linnoitta
     linna+N+Pl+Com: linnoin
     linna+N+Pl+Ine: linnoissa
     linna+N+Pl+Ela: linnoista
     linna+N+Pl+Ill: linnhoin
     linna+N+Pl+Ade: linnoila
     linna+N+Pl+Abl: linnoilta
     linna+N+Pl+All: linnoile
     linna+N+Pl+Ess: linnoina
